apertium-myv-fin.fin.lexc
LEXICON V_KATSOA

%<inf%>:a # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_O ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_JUOSTA

%<inf%>:sta # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:s V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:st V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:st V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_LASKEA

%<inf%>:ea # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:e V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ISTUA

%<inf%>:%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_HALUTA

%<inf%>:t%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ETSIÄ

%<inf%>:iä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_SG3_I ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:i V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_TULLA

%<inf%>:la # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_AJATELLA

%<inf%>:tella # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:el V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:tel V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:tel V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ISTUA

%<inf%>:a # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_SYNTYÄ

%<inf%>:tyä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ny V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ty V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ty V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ny V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ny V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ty V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_OLLA

%<inf%>:olla # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ole V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:o V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ol V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ol V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ol V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:on V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_WEAK

%<p1%>%<sg%>:n   V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:t   V_CLITS? ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:mme V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:tte V_CLITS? ;
%<conneg%>:0 V_CLITS? ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:0 V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_STRONG

%<p3%>%<pl%>:v%{A%}t V_CLITS? ;
%<inf%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:m%{A%}tt%{A%}   N_POSSES?      ;
%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ade%>:m%{A%}ll%{A%}   N_CLITS?     ;
%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:m%{A%}st%{A%}   N_CLITS?     ;
%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:m%{A%}%{A%}n    N_CLITS?     ;
%<inf%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:m%{A%}ss%{A%}   N_CLITS?     ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_SG3_A

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{A%} V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_SG3_E

%<p3%>%<sg%>:e V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_SG3_I

%<p3%>%<sg%>:i V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_SG3_O

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{O%} V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PRESENT_SG3_U

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%{U%} V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PAST_WEAK

%<p1%>%<sg%>:in   V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:it   V_CLITS? ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:imme V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:itte V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PAST_STRONG

%<p3%>%<sg%>:i V_CLITS? ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:iv%{A%}t V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PASSIVE_L

%<impers%>:l%{A%}%{A%}n V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PASSIVE_T

%<impers%>:t%{A%}%{A%}n V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PASSIVE_N

%<impers%>:n%{A%}%{A%}n V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_PASSIVE_D

%<impers%>:d%{A%}%{A%}n V_CLITS? ;

LEXICON V_NUT

%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:n%{U%}t N_CLITS? ;
%<pp%>:nee N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
%<pp%>:nee N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_COND

%<p1%>%<sg%>:isin   V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:isit   V_CLITS? ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:isi   V_CLITS? ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:isimme V_CLITS? ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:isitte V_CLITS? ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:isiv%{A%} V_CLITS? ;


LEXICON V_CLITS?
0   # ;
0 V_CLITS ;

LEXICON V_CLITS
%+ko%<qst%>:k%{O%} # ;

LEXICON A_VANHA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:%{A%}%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:%{O%} N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:%{O%} N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:%{O%} N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:%{O%} N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:%{O%} N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON A_HYVÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:hyvä N_POSSES? ;
0:hyvä N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:hyvä N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:hyvä N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:hyv N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:hyv N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:hyv N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:hyv N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:hyv N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON A_ILOINEN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:nen N_POSSES? ;
0:se N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:se N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:se N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:s N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:s N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:s N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:s N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON A_ISO

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 N_POSSES? ;
0 N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0 N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0 N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON A_LOPETTANUT

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{U%}t N_POSSES? ;
0:ee N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ee N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ee N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:e N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:e N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:e N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:e N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON A_PIENI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:i N_POSSES? ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:e N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON A_LÄMMIN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:min N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:mintä N_POSSES? ;
0:pimä N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:pimä N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:pimä N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:pim N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:pim N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:pim N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:pim N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:pim N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON PRON_MINÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ä  N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:ut N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:ua N_CLITS? ;
0:u N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:u N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:u N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;

LEXICON PRON_HÄN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0  N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:et N_CLITS? ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:e N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;

LEXICON PRON_ME

%<pl%>%<nom%>:0  N_CLITS? ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:id%{A%}n  N_CLITS? ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:id%{A%}t  N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON PRON_TÄMÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:mä N_CLITS? ;
0 N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0 N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;

LEXICON PRON_NÄMÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:mä N_CLITS? ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:iden N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON PRON_SE

%<sg%>%<nom%>:e N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:en N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:itä N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<all%>:ille N_CLITS? ;


LEXICON PRON_NE

%<sg%>%<nom%>:e N_CLITS? ;
0:i N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:i N_PLURALS_STRONG ;

LEXICON PRON_TUO

0:uo N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:uo N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;

LEXICON PRON_NUO
0:o N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:o N_PLURALS_STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_YKSI

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ksi  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ht%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:hde N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:hte N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:hte N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:ks N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ks N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ä  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ä%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:ä N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ä N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ä N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON Numerals
yksi%<num%>:y NUM_YKSI ;
kaksi%<num%>:ka NUM_YKSI ;
neljä%<num%>:nelj NUM_NELJÄ ;
